Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB231.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5912. Communications services for inmates in State or county correctional institutions.(a) Requirements.--The department and counties shall provide to all persons in their custody and confined in a State correctional institution or a county correctional institution, as applicable, voice communication services as follows:(1) The department and counties must maintain no less than the access to voice communication services and other communication services as was allowed by them on January 1, 2024.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) The department and counties must maintain a 10 to 1 ratio of persons in custody to operable voice communication devices in each housing unit or recreational yard with at least two voice communication devices inside each housing unit.(b) Optional additional communications services.--The department and counties may voluntarily supplement the voice communication services with other communication services, including video communication and email or messaging services.(c) Prohibition on fees and charges.--Voice communication services or other communication services shall be provided free of charge to an inmate and a service, whether initiated or received through a voice communication service or other communication service, shall be free of charge to the person initiating or receiving the communication.(d) Prohibition on revenue and commissions.--The department and counties shall be prohibited from charging an inmate for use of or access to a communication service, device or system.(e) Prohibition of replacing visits.--Communications services may not be used to replace an in-person visit program and nothing in this section shall authorize or permit the department or county to limit or prohibit in-person contact visits.(f) Funds.--(1) For fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $16,500,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the department, in addition to any funds deposited in the department's general government operations, for the purpose of supporting the cost of providing communications services to inmates in State or county correctional institutions.20250SB0231PN0184 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The appropriation and additional funds may not be used for indirect expenses related to the provision of communications services to inmates in State or county correctional institutions and are only eligible for invoiced expenses from a communication service vendor.(3) Any additional funds appropriated to the department for the supplemental allocation shall be allocated annually as follows:(i) 70% to the department; and(ii) 30% to counties, allocated to each county on a proportional basis calculated on a per capita inmate population in county correctional institutions.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Other communication services." Communication services other than voice communication services, including, but not limited to, video calls and electronic messages."Voice communication services." Real-time, audio-only communication services, namely telephone calls made over wireline telephony, voice over Internet protocol or any other technology infrastructure.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0231PN0184 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223